Louisiana, session 2026, HB417.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2205(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2205. Hazardous Waste Site Cleanup Fund
A.(1) All sums recovered through judgments, settlements, assessments of
civil or criminal penalties, funds recovered by suit or settlement from potentially
responsible parties for active or abandoned site remediation or cleanup, or otherwise
under this Subtitle, or other applicable law, each fiscal year for violation of this
Subtitle, shall be paid into the state treasury and shall be credited to the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund. After a sufficient amount is allocated from that fund
to pay all obligations secured by the full faith and credit of the state which become
due and payable within any fiscal year, the treasurer, prior to placing such remaining
funds in the state general fund, shall pay into a special fund, which is hereby created
in the state treasury and designated as the "Hazardous Waste Site Cleanup Fund", all
of those funds generated by the hazardous waste tax under the provisions of Chapter
7-A of Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 and the sums
recovered through all judgments, settlements, assessments of civil or criminal
penalties, fees and oversight costs received from potentially responsible parties for
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 417 ENROLLED
the department's work in overseeing of assessment and remediation at inactive or
abandoned sites, funds recovered by suit or settlement from potentially responsible
parties for active or abandoned site remediation or cleanup, or otherwise, for
violation of this Subtitle, except as provided in R.S. 30:2025 and 2198; however, the
balance in the fund shall not exceed six eight million dollars at any time and upon
the accumulation of six eight million dollars in the fund, the treasurer shall pay all
remaining sums provided for in this Subsection into the Environmental Trust
Dedicated Fund Account, R.S. 30:2015. However, beginning January 1, 2027, and
thereafter, the state treasurer shall annually adjust the maximum balance of the fund
by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
as reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, or
its successor, for the previous calendar year.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.